Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB485.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "tax credit" in section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Tax credit." A tax credit authorized under any of the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 following:* * *(8.2) Article XVII-M.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-MRESIDENTIAL ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING STATIONTAX CREDITSection 1701-M. Scope of article.This article establishes the Residential Electric Vehicle Charging Station Tax Credit.Section 1702-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Electric vehicle." An electric vehicle as defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Electric vehicle charging station." Private battery charging station equipment that has a primary purpose of transferring electric energy by conductive or inductive means to a battery or other energy storage device in an electric vehicle."Eligible taxpayer." A taxpayer eligible to receive a tax credit under this article."Tax credit." The Residential Electric Vehicle Charging Station Tax Credit established under this article."Taxpayer." An individual subject to tax under Article III.Section 1703-M. Tax credit.(a) Purpose.--The tax credit shall be applied against an eligible taxpayer's liability under Article III if the taxpayer 20250SB0485PN0458 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchases and installs an electric vehicle charging station.(b) Limitation.--The tax credit shall be limited to the taxable year that the electric vehicle charging station was placed in service by the eligible taxpayer.(c) Amount.--The amount of the tax credit shall be 100% of the cost to purchase and install the electric vehicle charging station, not to exceed $2,000.(d) Credit refundable.--If the amount of tax credit that the eligible taxpayer is eligible to receive under this article exceeds the eligible taxpayer's tax liability under Article III, the department shall issue a refund of the excess amount to the eligible taxpayer.Section 1704-M. Eligibility.To be eligible for a tax credit under this article, a taxpayer must:(1) Have resided in this Commonwealth for more than one-half of the preceding taxable year.(2) Provide an individual taxpayer identification number.(3) Have placed in service an electric vehicle charging station at the primary residence owned by the taxpayer.Section 1705-M. Guidelines and regulations.The department shall publish guidelines and may promulgate regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.Section 1706-M. Applicability.This article shall apply to tax years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0485PN0458 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829